pt-PT: Formato/perfil do fio: Entrançado; Meio redondo; Retangular/plano; Redondo; Quadrado; Torcido; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika/profil žic: Pleteno; Polkrožno; Pravokotno/ploščato; Okroglo; Kvadratno; Sukano; Drugo
ko: 와이어 모양/프로파일: 편조형; 반원형; 직사각형/평면형; 원형; 정사각형; 트위스트형; 기타
nb: Trådform eller -profil: Flettet; Halvrund; Rektangulær/flat; Rund; Firkantet; Tvunnet; Annet
da: Wireform eller -profil: Flettet; Halvrund; Rektangel/flad; Rund; Firkantet; Snoet; Andet
vi: Hình dạng/mặt cắt ngang của dây: Bện; Bán nguyệt; Chữ nhật/Dẹt; Tròn; Vuông; Xoắn; Khác
th: รูปทรงหรือลักษณะของลวด: ถัก; ครึ่งวงกลม; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า/แบน; กลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ตีเกลียว; อื่นๆ
sv: Trådform/profil: Flätad; Halvrund; Rektangulär/platt; Rund; Fyrkantig; Tvinnad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма/профил на проводника: Плетено; Полукръгло; Правоъгълно/плоско; Кръгло; Квадратно; Усукано; Друго
fr: Forme ou profil du fil: Tressé; Demi-rond; Rectangle/plat; Rond; Carré; Torsadé; Autre
cs: Tvar/profil drátu: Splétaný; Polokulatý; Obdélníkový/plochý; Kulatý; Čtvercový; Kroucený; Jiné
pl: Kształt/profil drutu: Pleciony; Półokrągły; Prostokątny/płaski; Okrągły; Kwadratowy; Skręcany; Inny
tr: Tel kesit şekli/profili: Örgülü; Yarım yuvarlak; Dikdörtgen/Düz; Yuvarlak; Kare; Bükümlü; Diğer
ru: Форма или профиль проволоки: Плетеная; Полукруглая; Прямоугольная / плоская; Круглая; Квадратная; Витая; Другое
hr-HR: Profil/oblik žice: Pleteni; Polukružni; Pravokutni/ravni; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Upleteni; Ostalo
de: Drahtform/-profil: Geflochten; Halbrund; Rechteckig/Flach; Rund; Quadratisch; Verdrillt; Sonstige
sk-SK: Tvar drôtu/profil: Zapletané; Polkruhové; Obdĺžnikové/ploché; Okrúhle; Štvorcové; Krútené; Iné
zh-TW: 線材形狀/輪廓: 編織; 半圓; 矩形/扁平; 圓形; 方形; 絞線; 其他
lt-LT: Vielos forma / profilis: Pinta; Pusapvalė; Stačiakampė / plokščia; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Susukta; Kita
zh-CN: 线材形状/轮廓: 编织; 半圆形; 矩形/扁平; 圆形; 方形; 扭绞; 其他
el: Σχήμα/προφίλ σύρματος: Πλεγμένο; Ημικυκλικό; Ορθογώνιο/Πλακέ; Στρόγγυλο; Τετράγωνο; Συνεστραμμένο; Άλλο
ja: ワイヤー形状／プロファイル: 編組; ハーフラウンド; 長方形/平型; ラウンド; 正方形; ツイスト; その他
pt-BR: Fio formato/perfil: Trançado; Meio redondo; Retangular/Plano; Redondo; Quadrado; Torcido; Outro
fi: Johtimen muoto/profiili: Punottu; Puolipyöreä; Suorakulmainen/litteä; Pyöreä; Neliö; Kierretty; Muu
hu: Huzal alakja/profilja: Fonott; Félkerek; Téglalap alakú/lapos; Kerek; Négyzet alakú; Csavart; Egyéb
en: Wire shape/profile: Braided; Half-round; Rectangle/Flat; Round; Square; Twisted; Other
it: Forma/profilo del filo: Intrecciato; Mezzotondo; Rettangolare/Piatto; Rotondo; Quadrato; Ritorto; Altro
ro-RO: Forma/profilul sârmei: Împletit; Semicircular; Dreptunghiular/Plat; Rotund; Pătrat; Răsucit; Altele
nl: Draad vorm/profiel: Gevlochten; Halfrond; Rechthoekig/plat; Rond; Vierkant; Gedraaid; Overige
es: Forma/perfil del alambre: Trenzado; Media caña; Rectangular/plano; Redondo; Cuadrado; Retorcido; Otro